src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_SEIKKAILU
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 2u
!!€  seikkailu: seikkailu+N+Sg+Nom # adventure
!!€  seikkailuja: seikkailu+N+Pl+Par
!!€  seikkailuita: seikkailu+N+Pl+Par
!!€  seikkailujen: seikkailu+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  seikkailuiden: seikkailu+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  seikkailuitten: seikkailu+N+Pl+Gen
0  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 2u non-standard
!!€  seikkailuin: seikkailu+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  seikkailuhun: seikkailu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN  ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON NOUN_VEHKEILY
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 2y
!!€  vehkeily: vehkeily+N+Sg+Nom # mutiny
!!€  vehkeilyjä: vehkeily+N+Pl+Par
!!€  vehkeilyitä: vehkeily+N+Pl+Par
!!€  vehkeilyjen: vehkeily+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  vehkeilyitten: vehkeily+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  vehkeilyiden: vehkeily+N+Pl+Gen
0  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 2y non-standard
!!€  vehkeilyin: vehkeily+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  vehkeilyhyn: vehkeily+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN  ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 2ö
!!€  jäätelö: jäätelö+N+Sg+Nom iced cream
!!€  jäätelöjen: jäätelö+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  jäätelöiden: jäätelö+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  jäätelöitten: jäätelö+N+Pl+Gen
0  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 2ö non-standard
!!€  jäätelöin: jäätelö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  jäätelöhön: jäätelö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN  ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON NOUN_TUOMIO
!!  The words with stem vowel o, u, y, ö preceded by vowels still have no
!!  more stem  variation than other cases, but give yet another pattern of
!!  allomorphs for plural partitives and GENITIVEs:
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 3o
!!€  tuomio: tuomio+N+Sg+Nom # judgment
!!€  tuomiota: tuomio+N+Sg+Par
!!$  tuomioa: tuomio+N+Sg+Par
!!€  tuomioita: tuomio+N+Pl+Par
!!€  tuomioiden: tuomio+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  tuomioitten: tuomio+N+Pl+Gen
!!$  tuomiojen: tuomio+N+Pl+Gen
0  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
!!  There's plenty of imaginable non-standard allomorph forms after long
!!  vowels:
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 3o non-standard
!!€  tuomioa: tuomio+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Par
!!€  tuomioin: tuomio+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  tuomiohon: tuomio+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
!!€  tuomioja: tuomio+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Par
!!€  tuomiojen: tuomio+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON  ; ! in NS's intro prose
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ; ! not documented
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ; ! not documented

LEXICON NOUN_HÄIRIÖ
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 3ö
!!€  häiriö: häiriö+N+Sg+Nom # disruption
!!€  häiriötä: häiriö+N+Sg+Par
!!€  häiriöiden: häiriö+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  häiriöitten: häiriö+N+Pl+Gen
0  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 3ö non-standard
!!€  häiriöä: häiriö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Par
!!€  häiriöin: häiriö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  häiriöhön: häiriö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
!!€  häiriöjä: häiriö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Par
!!€  häiriöjen: häiriö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN  ; ! in NS's intro prose
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ; ! not documented
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ; ! not documented

LEXICON NOUN_ZOMBIE
!!  Similar inflection exists in limited amounts in new loan words that are
!!  written as pronounced (thus taking no stem variation but still ending
!!  with long vowels with a syllable boundary):
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 3eta
!!€  zombie: zombie+N+Sg+Nom # zombie
!!€  zombieta: zombie+N+Sg+Par
!!€  zombieita: zombie+N+Pl+Par
!!€  zombieiden: zombie+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  zombieitten: zombie+N+Pl+Gen
0  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 3eta non-standard
!!€  zombiea: zombie+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Par
!!€  zombiein: zombie+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  zombiehen: zombie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
!!€  zombieja: zombie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Par
!!€  zombiejen: zombie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEN  ; ! in NS's intro prose
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ; ! not documented
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ; ! not documented

LEXICON NOUN_BERNIE
!!  This class includes a set of new proper nouns that get nativised a bit:
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 3etä
!!€  Bernie: Bernie+N+Prop+Sg+Nom # Bernie
!!€  Bernietä: Bernie+N+Prop+Sg+Par
!!€  Bernieitä: Bernie+N+Prop+Pl+Par
!!€  Bernieiden: Bernie+N+Prop+Pl+Gen
!!€  Bernieitten: Bernie+N+Prop+Pl+Gen
0  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 3etä non-standard
!!€  Berniea: Bernie+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Par
!!€  Berniein: Bernie+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  Berniehen: Bernie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
!!€  Bernieja: Bernie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Par
!!€  Berniejen: Bernie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN  ; ! in NS's intro prose
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ; ! not documented
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ; ! not documented
