src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
all% stars% -joukkue+N:all% stars% #-joukkue NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
all% stars% -joukkue+N:all% stars% -joukkue  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
asylaatio+N:asylaatio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
australiankelpie+N:australian#kelpie  NOUN_BERNIE  ;
australiankelpie+N:australiankelpie  NOUN_BERNIE  ;
avenue+N:avenue  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
baritonioboe+N:baritonioboe  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
beetasäteily+N:beeta#säteily  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
caddie+N:caddie  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
dieettikeittiö+N:dieettikeittiö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
differentiaaliyhtälö+N:differentiaaliyhtälö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
dodekyylitio+N:dodekyylitio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
eläinsuojelu+N:eläin#suojelu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
erie+N:erie  NOUN_BERNIE  ;
erie+N:erie  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
etäkäsittely+N:etäkäsittely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
fumigaatio+N:fumigaatio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
haamuneliö+N:haamuneliö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
heinätähtimö+N:heinä#tähtimö NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ ;
hemoptoe+N:hemoptoe  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
herneenviljely+N:herneen#viljely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
hoipertelu+N:hoipertelu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
hymiö+N:hymiö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
ilmoitusmenettely+N:ilmoitusmenettely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
immuunireaktio+N:immuuni#reaktio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
jäljentämö+N:jäljentämö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
järvimatkailu+N:järvimatkailu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
kääpiövaltio+N:kääpiö#valtio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
kaasuyhtiö+N:kaasuyhtiö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
kampaushyytelö+N:kampaushyytelö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
katukaupustelu+N:katukaupustelu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
kauranviljely+N:kauranviljely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
keittimö+N:keittimö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
kenttäkeittiö+N:kenttäkeittiö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
kieltotuomio+N:kielto#tuomio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
kiukuttelu+N:kiukuttelu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
kohdeyhtiö+N:kohde#yhtiö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
konepäällystö+N:kone#päällystö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
ksenotransplantaatio+N:ksenotransplantaatio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
kustannuserittely+N:kustannus#erittely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
kuukausijulkaisu+N:kuu#kausi#julkaisu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
kylmiö+N:kylmiö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
lääkeaaloe+N:lääke#aaloe  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
lassie+N:lassie  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
lautamiehistö+N:lautamiehistö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
liemikuutio+N:liemikuutio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
loistoeliö+N:loisto#eliö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
loistoristeily+N:loisto#risteily  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
loppuratkaisu+N:loppu#ratkaisu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
maanpuolustusjärjestö+N:maanpuolustusjärjestö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
mittatappio+N:mitta#tappio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
moitiskelu+N:moitiskelu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
muoti-ilmiö+N:muoti-ilmiö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
näyttely+N:näyttely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
omenahyytelö+N:omena#hyytelö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
onnahtelu+N:onnahtelu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
orkanisatio+N:orkanisatio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
otoe+N:otoe  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
persoonallisuushäiriö+N:persoonallisuushäiriö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
piikkiaaloe+N:piikkiaaloe  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
pintakäsittely+N:pinta#käsittely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
poliisivaltio+N:poliisi#valtio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
pöperö+N:pöperö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
pörssikeinottelu+N:pörssikeinottelu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
rauhanturvaoperaatio+N:rauhanturvaoperaatio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
raviurheilu+N:ravi#urheilu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
riistoviljely+N:riisto#viljely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
ruumiskylmiö+N:ruumis#kylmiö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
sanitaatio+N:sanitaatio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
scrapie+N:scrapie  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
seksihurjastelu+N:seksihurjastelu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
silkinviljely+N:silkinviljely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
simultaaninäyttämö+N:simultaani#näyttämö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
sulatushäiriö+N:sulatushäiriö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
sulkukammio+N:sulkukammio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
terroristijärjestö+N:terroristijärjestö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
tietokonekäsittely+N:tieto#kone#käsittely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
tonttikeinottelu+N:tontti#keinottelu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
tyrmäyshäviö+N:tyrmäyshäviö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
valiokuntatyöskentely+N:valiokuntatyöskentely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
varasjoukkio+N:varas#joukkio  NOUN_TUOMIO  ;
vasikkahyytelö+N:vasikkahyytelö  NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
vesivoimistelu+N:vesi#voimistelu  NOUN_SEIKKAILU  ;
viljely+N:viljely  NOUN_VEHKEILY  ;
yleisradioyhtiö+N:yleisradioyhtiö  NOUN_HÄIRIÖ  ;
zombie+N:zombie  NOUN_ZOMBIE  ;
luhtatähtimö+N:luhta#tähtimö NOUN_JÄÄTELÖ ; ! nouns.lexc NOUN
